scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     abweninjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabweninjii
     abweninjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabweninjii
     abweninjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabweninjii
     abweninjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abweninjii
     abweninjii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abweninjiid
     abweninjii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebweninjiid
     agawaateshkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agawaateshkaa
     agawaateshkaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agawaateshkaad
     agawaateshkaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egawaateshkaad
     agaasininjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagaasininjii
     agaasininjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agaasininjii
     agaasininjii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agaasininjiid
     agaasininjii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egaasininjiid
     agidaakiiwebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagidaakiiwebatoo
     agidaakiiwebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagidaakiiwebatoo
     agidaakiiwebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagidaakiiwebatoo
     agidaakiiwebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agidaakiiwebatoo
     agidaakiiwebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agidaakiiwebatood
     agidaakiiwebatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egidaakiiwebatood
     agigokaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagigokaa
     agigokaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagigokaa
     agigokaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagigokaa
     agigokaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agigokaa 
     agigokaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agigokaad
     agigokaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egigokaad
     agoodakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagoodakii
     agoodakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodakii
     agoodakii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: agoodakiiyaan
     agoodakii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodakiid
     agoodakii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egoodakiid
     agoodakii+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: agoodakiin
     agoodasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagoodasabii
     agoodasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagoodasabii
     agoodasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagoodasabii
     agoodasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodasabii 
     agoodasabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodasabiid
     agoodasabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egoodasabiid
     agoodinasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagoodinasabii
     agoodinasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagoodinasabii
     agoodinasabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodinasabii
     agoodinasabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodinasabiid
     agoodinasabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egoodinasabiid
     agoodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagoodoo
     agoodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagoodoo
     agoodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagoodoo
     agoodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodoo
     agoodoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoodood
     agoodoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egoodood
     agwanii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwanii
     agwanii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwanii
     agwanii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaniid
     agwanii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaniid
     agwaabatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwaabatoo
     agwaabatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaabatoo
     agwaabatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagwaabatoo
     agwaabatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaabatoo
     agwaabatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaabatood
     agwaabatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaabatood
     agwaabiitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwaabiitaa
     agwaabiitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaabiitaa
     agwaabiitaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaabiitaad
     agwaabiitaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaabiitaad
     agwaadaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwaadaabii
     agwaadaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaadaabii
     agwaadaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagwaadaabii
     agwaadaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaadaabii 
     agwaadaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaadaabiid
     agwaadaabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaadaabiid
     agwaa'iskomii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaa'iskomii
     agwaa'iskomii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaa'iskomii
     agwaa'iskomii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaa'iskomiid
     agwaa'iskomii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaa'iskomiid
     agwaataa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwaataa
     agwaataa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaataa
     agwaataa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagwaataa
     agwaataa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaataa 
     agwaataa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaataad
     agwaataa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaataad
     agwaayaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwaayaadagaa
     agwaayaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaayaadagaa
     agwaayaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagwaayaadagaa
     agwaayaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaayaadagaa
     agwaayaadagaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaayaadagaad
     agwaayaadagaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaayaadagaad
     agwaayaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwaayaadagaazii
     agwaayaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaayaadagaazii
     agwaayaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagwaayaadagaazii
     agwaayaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaayaadagaazii
     agwaayaadagaazii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaayaadagaaziid
     agwaayaadagaazii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaayaadagaaziid
     agwaayaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaayaadagaaziibatoo
     agwaayaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaayaadagaaziibatoo
     agwaayaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaayaadagaaziibatood
     agwaayaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaayaadagaaziibatood
     agwaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwaazii
     agwaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaazii
     agwaazii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaaziid
     agwaazii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaaziid
     agwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwii
     agwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwii
     agwii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwiid
     akandoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indakandoo
     akandoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindakandoo
     akandoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidakandoo
     akandoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akandoo 
     akandoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akandood
     akandoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ekandood
     akobii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akobii
     akobii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akobiid
     akobii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ekobiid
     akwa'waa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indakwa'waa
     akwa'waa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindakwa'waa
     akwa'waa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidakwa'waa
     akwa'waa+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akwa'waa 
     akwa'waa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akwa'waad
     akwa'waa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg:  ekwa'waad
     akwa'waa+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+Incl: akwa'waadaa
     akwaandawebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indakwaandawebatoo
     akwaandawebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindakwaandawebatoo
     akwaandawebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidakwaandawebatoo
     akwaandawebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akwaandawebatoo
     akwaandawebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akwaandawebatood
     akwaandawebatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ekwaandawebatood
     akwaandawedaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indakwaandawedaabii
     akwaandawedaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akwaandawedaabii
     akwaandawedaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akwaandawedaabiid
     akwaandawedaabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ekwaandawedaabiid
     anami'aa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanami'aa
     anami'aa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanami'aa
     anami'aa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanami'aa
     anami'aa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anami'aa 
     anami'aa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anami'aad
     anami'aa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enami'aad
     andawadabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawadabii
     andawadabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawadabii
     andawadabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawadabiid
     andawadabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawadabiid
     andawagoodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawagoodoo
     andawagoodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawagoodoo
     andawagoodoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawagoodood
     andawagoodoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawagoodood
     andawagoodoo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: andawagoodoon
     andawanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawanokii
     andawanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawanokii
     andawanokii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawanokiid
     andawanokii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawanokiid
     andoobii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandoobii
     andoobii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andoobii
     andoobii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andoobiid
     andoobii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endoobiid
     anima'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanima'adoo
     anima'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanima'adoo
     anima'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanima'adoo
     anima'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anima'adoo 
     anima'adoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anima'adood
     anima'adoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enima'adood
     animaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimaadagaa
     animaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimaadagaa
     animaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimaadagaa
     animaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaa
     animaadagaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaad
     animaadagaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimaadagaad
     animaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimaadagaakobatoo
     animaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaakobatoo
     animaadagaakobatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaakobatood
     animaadagaakobatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimaadagaakobatood
     animaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimaadagaazii
     animaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimaadagaazii
     animaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimaadagaazii
     animaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaazii
     animaadagaazii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaaziid
     animaadagaazii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimaadagaaziid
     animaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaaziibatoo
     animaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaadagaaziibatood
     animaadagaaziibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimaadagaaziibatood
     animaagonagii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimaagonagii
     animaagonagii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimaagonagii
     animaagonagii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimaagonagii
     animaagonagii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: animaagonagii
     animaagonagii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaagonagiid
     animaagonagii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimaagonagiid
     animaazhagaamebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimaazhagaamebatoo
     animaazhagaamebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaazhagaamebatoo
     animaazhagaamebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animaazhagaamebatood
     animaazhagaamebatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimaazhagaamebatood
     animibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimibatoo
     animibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animibatoo
     animibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animibatood
     animibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimibatood
     animibatoo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: animibatoon
     animidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimidaabii
     animidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimidaabii
     animidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimidaabii
     animidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animidaabii
     animidaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: animidaabiiyaan
     animidaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animidaabiid
     animidaabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimidaabiid
     animikotaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimikotaa
     animikotaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimikotaa
     animikotaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animikotaa
     animikotaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animikotaad
     animikotaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimikotaad
     animikwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimikwii
     animikwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animikwii
     animikwii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animikwiid
     animikwii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimikwiid
     animishkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimishkaa
     animishkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimishkaa
     animishkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimishkaa
     animishkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animishkaa
     animishkaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animishkaad
     animishkaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimishkaad
     animwewebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animwewebatoo
     animwewebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animwewebatood
     animwewebatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimwewebatood
     animwewetoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimwewetoo
     animwewetoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimwewetoo
     animwewetoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimwewetoo
     animwewetoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animwewetoo
     animwewetoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animwewetood
     animwewetoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimwewetood
     animweweyaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animweweyaadagaa
     animweweyaadagaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animweweyaadagaad
     animweweyaadagaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimweweyaadagaad
     animweweyaadagaazii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animweweyaadagaazii
     animweweyaadagaazii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animweweyaadagaaziid
     animweweyaadagaazii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimweweyaadagaaziid
     anokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanokii
     anokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanokii
     anokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanokii
